Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2502
Purpose of act.

In order to (1) safeguard the public health, safety, and welfare, (2) protect the public from being misled by incompetent, unscrupulous, and unauthorized persons, (3) assure the highest degree of professional conduct on the part of occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants, and (4) assure the availability of occupational therapy services of high quality to persons in need of such services, it is the purpose of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act to provide for the regulation of occupational therapists.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 30;

R.S.1943, (2003) § 71-6102;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 842.